Louisiana, session 2026, HB574.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 28:64(A)(3) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§64. Mental Health Advocacy Service; creation; board of trustees; organization;
powers; duties
A.
* * *
(3) The service shall be governed by a board of trustees consisting of nine
members to be made up of the deans of the law schools or their designated faculty
members from Loyola University of the South, Southern University and Agricultural
and Mechanical College Law Schools and from the medical and law schools of
Louisiana State University and Agricultural and Mechanical College and Tulane
University of Louisiana, the president of the Mental Health Association of Louisiana
Louisiana Mental Health Association or his representative, and a selected member
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 574 ENROLLED
from the Louisiana Medical Society Louisiana State Medical Society and the
Louisiana State Bar Association.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.